Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-662
Sidewalk, defined.

Sidewalk shall mean that portion of a highway between the curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property lines, intended for use by pedestrians.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 158.

Criminal liability under section 60-6,196 does not extend to intoxicated persons in control of a vehicle parked on a residential driveway, regardless of whether part of the vehicle crosses a sidewalk. State v. McCave, 282 Neb. 500, 805 N.W.2d 290 (2011).

Sidewalk is portion of street between curb lines, or lateral lines of roadway and adjacent property lines, intended for use by pedestrians. Therkildsen v. Gottsch, 194 Neb. 729, 235 N.W.2d 622 (1975).